tables/en-ueb-g2.ctb
match %[_~^]%<* would've (s|'s)?%>*%[_~^] 2456-145-3-1236-15
match %[_~^]%<* woulda (s|'s)?%>*%[_~^] 2456-145-1
match %[_~^]%<* wouldest (s|'s)?%>*%[_~^] 2456-145-15-34
match %[_~^]%<* wouldn't (s|'s)?%>*%[_~^] 2456-145-1345-3-2345
match %[_~^]%<* wouldn't've (s|'s)?%>*%[_~^] 2456-145-1345-3-2345-3-1236-15
match %[_~^]%<* wouldst (s|'s)?%>*%[_~^] 2456-145-34
